Tennessee, session 114, SB0747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1503(a)(4), is amended by
deleting the language "thirty (30) business days" and substituting instead the language "forty-
five (45) business days".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1506, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(c) The office of emergency services may provide the bureau with additional
data, including reports containing protected health information, as needed to ensure the
assessment program remains in compliance with state and federal laws.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1509, is amended by deleting
the language "June 30, 2025" and substituting instead the language "June 30, 2026".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0747
001729
- 1 -